Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0054.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the provisions of this act shall does not apply to contracts entered into or the bids made before the effective date of this act.February 13, 2024. (2) This act does not apply to a state project if the state project was paid for, in whole or in part, from revenue from a millage, bond, or bond proposal that meets both of the following conditions: (a) The millage, bond, or bond proposal was authorized under the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852. (b) The millage, bond, or bond proposal was authorized before the effective date of this act.February 13, 2024.